Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB849.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 4915.3. Failure to comply with child abuse offender registration requirements.(a) Offense defined.--A child abuse offender commits an offense if the child abuse offender knowingly fails to:(1) register with the Pennsylvania State Police as required under 42 Pa.C.S. § 9799.83 (relating to period of registration), 9799.86 (relating to initial registration) or 9799.91 (relating to verification by child abuse offenders and Pennsylvania State Police);1234567891011121314151617181920 (2) verify the child abuse offender's address or be photographed as required under 42 Pa.C.S. § 9799.83 or 9799.91;(3) provide accurate information when registering under 42 Pa.C.S. §§ 9799.83, 9799.86 and 9799.91; or(4) fails to comply with 42 Pa.C.S. § 9799.101 (relating to counseling requirement).(b) Grading.--(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a child abuse offender commits a felony of the second degree if the individual violates subsection (a).(2) An individual commits a felony of the first degree if the individual violates subsection (a) and has been previously convicted of an offense under subsection (a).(c) Effect of notice.--The failure on the part of the Pennsylvania State Police to send or failure of a child abuse offender to receive any notice or information under 42 Pa.C.S. § 9799.91 may not be a defense to a prosecution commenced against an individual arising from a violation of this section. The provisions of 42 Pa.C.S. § 9799.91 are not an element of an offense under this section.(d) Arrests for violation.--(1) A police officer shall have the same right of arrest without a warrant as in a felony whenever the police officer has probable cause to believe an individual has committed a violation of this section regardless of whether the violation occurred in the presence of the police officer.(2) An individual arrested for a violation of this section shall be afforded a preliminary arraignment by the proper issuing authority without unnecessary delay. In no 20250HB0849PN0879 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 case may the individual be released from custody without first having appeared before the issuing authority.(3) Prior to admitting an individual arrested for a violation of this section to bail, the issuing authority shall require all of the following:(i) The individual must be fingerprinted and photographed in the manner required by 42 Pa.C.S. Ch. 97 Subch. J (relating to registration of child abuse offenders).(ii) The individual must provide the Pennsylvania State Police with all current or intended residences, all information concerning current or intended employment, including all employment locations, and all information concerning current or intended enrollment as a student. This subparagraph includes an individual who is a transient, in which case the individual must, in addition to other information required under this subparagraph, provide the information under 42 Pa.C.S. § 9799.84(b)(6) (relating to registry).(iii) Law enforcement must make reasonable attempts to verify the information provided by the individual.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Child abuse offender." The term shall have the same meaning as under 42 Pa.C.S. § 9799.80 (relating to definitions)."Transient." The term shall have the meaning as under 42 Pa.C.S. § 9799.80.Section 2. Chapter 97 of Title 42 is amended by adding a subchapter to read:20250HB0849PN0879 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 SUBCHAPTER JREGISTRATION OF CHILD ABUSE OFFENDERSSec.9799.80. Definitions.9799.81. Child abuse risk assessment.9799.82. Applicability.9799.83. Period of registration.9799.84. Registry.9799.85. Information sharing.9799.86. Initial registration.9799.87. Duty to inform.9799.88. Penalties.9799.89. Enforcement.9799.90. Court notification and classification requirements.9799.91. Verification by child abuse offenders and Pennsylvania State Police.9799.92. Victim notification.9799.93. Publicly accessible Internet website.9799.94. Administration.9799.95. Global positioning system technology.9799.96. Immunity for good faith conduct.9799.97. Duties of Pennsylvania State Police.9799.98. Duties of Department of Corrections and probation and parole officials.9799.99. Duties of facilities housing child abuse offenders.9799.100. Board.9799.101. Counseling requirement.9799.102. Photographs and fingerprinting.§ 9799.80. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter 20250HB0849PN0879 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Board." The Child Abuse Offender Assessment Board."Child." An individual under 18 years old."Child abuse offender." An individual required by a court order to register in accordance with this subchapter."Child abuse personal injury crime." One of the following acts, attempt, solicitation or conspiracy to commit an act which would constitute a misdemeanor or felony if the victim is a child:(1) 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 25 (relating to criminal homicide).(2) 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 26 (relating to crimes against unborn child).(3) 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 27 (relating to assault).(4) 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 29 (relating to kidnapping).(5) 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 30 (relating to human trafficking).(6) 18 Pa.C.S. § 4303 (relating to concealing death of child).(7) 18 Pa.C.S. § 4304 (relating to endangering welfare of children).(8) 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 49 Subch. B (relating to victim and witness intimidation).(9) 18 Pa.C.S. § 6301 (relating to corruption of minors).(10) 18 Pa.C.S. § 6315 (relating to selling or furnishing butane to minors).(11) 18 Pa.C.S. § 6316 (relating to selling or furnishing certain stimulants to minors).(12) 18 Pa.C.S. § 6319 (relating to solicitation of minors to traffic drugs).20250HB0849PN0879 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Convicted." Includes conviction by entry of plea of guilty or nolo contendere, conviction after trial or court martial and a finding of not guilty due to insanity or of guilty but mentally ill."Deadly weapon." The term shall have the meaning as under 18 Pa.C.S. § 2301 (relating to definitions)."Employed." Includes a vocation or employment that is full time or part time for a period of time exceeding four days during a seven-day period or for an aggregate period of time exceeding 14 days during any calendar year, whether self-employed, volunteered, financially compensated, pursuant to a contract or for the purpose of governmental or educational benefit."Mental abnormality." A congenital or acquired condition of an individual that affects the emotional or volitional capacity of the individual in a manner that predisposes that individual to the commission of criminal violent acts to a degree that makes the individual a menace to the health and safety of other persons."NCIC." The National Crime Information Center."Registry." The Statewide Registry of Child Abuse Offenders established under this subchapter."Student." An individual who is enrolled in or attends a public or private educational institution within this Commonwealth on a full-time or part-time basis, including a secondary school, trade or professional institution or institution of higher education. The term does not include an individual enrolled in an educational institution exclusively through the Internet or via correspondence courses."Temporary lodging." The specific location, including street 20250HB0849PN0879 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 address, where a child abuse offender is staying when away from the child abuse offender's residence for seven or more days."Transient." A child abuse offender who does not have a residence but nevertheless resides in this Commonwealth in a temporary habitat or other temporary place of abode or dwelling, including a homeless shelter or park.§ 9799.81. Child abuse risk assessment.(a) Order for assessment.--Except as provided in subsection (h) and section 9799.83(b) (relating to period of registration), after petition by the prosecuting district attorney or when the court otherwise deems it necessary, a court shall order an individual convicted of a child abuse personal injury crime to be assessed by the board following conviction but before sentencing. The order for an assessment shall be sent to the executive director of the board within 10 days of:(1) the date of conviction of the child abuse personal injury crime; or(2) receipt of the request for an assessment under subsection (h).(b) Assessment.--Upon receipt from the court of an order for an assessment under subsection (a), a member of the board as designated by the executive director of the board shall conduct an assessment of the individual to determine if the individual should be classified as a child abuse offender. The board shall establish standards for evaluations and for evaluators conducting an assessment. An assessment shall include an examination of the following:(1) Facts of the current offense, including:(i) Whether the offense involved multiple victims.(ii) Whether the individual exceeded the means 20250HB0849PN0879 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 necessary to achieve the offense.(iii) Whether the individual used a deadly weapon during the commission of the offense.(iv) Evidence of torture, extreme cruelty or sadistic behavior.(v) The extent and nature of the physical harm inflicted on the victim.(vi) Relationship of the individual to the victim.(vii) Age of the victim.(viii) Whether the offense included a display of unusual cruelty by the individual during the commission of the crime.(ix) The mental capacity of the victim.(x) Whether the offense involved planning, preparation or premeditation.(2) Prior history of conduct or behavior related to child abuse, including:(i) The individual's prior criminal record.(ii) Whether the individual previously completed sentences for other offenses.(iii) Whether the individual participated in available programs required by the court of the Department of Corrections.(iv) Whether the individual exhibited patterns of conduct or behavior that included child abuse.(v) Prior assessments conducted by the board.(vi) Whether the individual was previously subject to child abuse offender registration requirements.(3) Characteristics of the individual, including:(i) Age.20250HB0849PN0879 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) Use of illegal drugs.(iii) Mental illness, mental disability or mental abnormality.(iv) Behavioral characteristics that contribute to the individual's conduct.(4) Factors that are supported in a child abuse assessment field as criteria reasonably related to the risk of re-offense.(c) Release of information.--All State, county and local agencies, offices and entities in this Commonwealth shall cooperate by providing copies of records and information as requested by the board in connection with the court-ordered assessment and the assessment requested by the Pennsylvania Parole Board.(d) Submission of report.--The board shall have 90 days from the date of conviction of the individual being assessed to submit a written report containing the assessment to the district attorney.(e) Summary of offense.--The board shall prepare a description of the offense or offenses that trigger the application of this subchapter and include:(1) A concise narrative of the individual's conduct.(2) The age of the victim and the individual's relationship to the victim.(3) Any physical, mental or emotional injury of the victim.(4) The use of a weapon or physical force used or threatened, if any.(5) If the offense was part of a course or pattern of conduct involving multiple incidents or victims.20250HB0849PN0879 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) Previous instances in which the individual was determined guilty of a child abuse personal injury crime.(f) Hearing and determination.--(1) After praecipe filed by a district attorney, a hearing to determine whether the individual is a child abuse offender and whether the individual shall be subject to public registration requirements under this subchapter shall be scheduled. The district attorney, after the filing of a praecipe, shall serve a copy of the praecipe and the report of the board under this section to defense counsel.(2) The individual and district attorney shall be given notice of the hearing and an opportunity to be heard, the right to call witnesses, the right to call expert witnesses and the right to cross-examine witnesses. The convicted individual shall have the right to counsel and to have an attorney appointed to represent the individual if the convicted individual cannot afford one. If the convicted individual requests an expert assessment, the convicted individual shall provide a copy of the expert assessment to the district attorney prior to the hearing.(3) At the hearing prior to sentencing, the court shall determine whether the Commonwealth has proved by clear and convincing evidence that the convicted individual is a child abuse offender.(4) If the Commonwealth proves by clear and convincing evidence that the convicted individual is a child abuse offender, the court shall order the convicted individual to register as a child abuse offender in accordance with section 9799.83.(5) A copy of the order containing the determination of 20250HB0849PN0879 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the court shall be immediately submitted to the convicted individual, the district attorney, the Pennsylvania Parole Board, the Department of Corrections, the board and the Pennsylvania State Police.(g) Presentence investigation.--If the board has performed an assessment under this section, copies of the assessment report shall be provided to the agency preparing the presentence investigation.(h) Parole assessment.--The Department of Corrections or Pennsylvania Parole Board may request that the board conduct an assessment of a child abuse offender and that an assessment report be provided to the Pennsylvania Parole Board prior to consideration for parole.§ 9799.82. Applicability.The following individuals shall register with the Pennsylvania State Police as provided in sections 9799.83 (relating to period of registration), 9799.86 (relating to initial registration) and 9799.91 (relating to verification by child abuse offenders and Pennsylvania State Police) and otherwise comply with this subchapter:(1) A child abuse offender who has a residence within this Commonwealth or is a transient.(2) A child abuse offender who is convicted in this Commonwealth and who does not have a residence in this Commonwealth and:(i) is employed in this Commonwealth; or(ii) is a student in this Commonwealth.(3) A child abuse offender who is an inmate in a State or county correctional institution of this Commonwealth, including a community corrections center or a community 20250HB0849PN0879 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 contract facility, is being supervised by the Department of Corrections or county probation or parole, is subject to a sentence of intermediate punishment or restrictive conditions of probation or has supervision transferred pursuant to the Interstate Compact for Adult Supervision.(4) A child abuse offender who is an inmate in a Federal correctional institution or is supervised by Federal probation authorities and who:(i) has a residence within this Commonwealth or is a transient;(ii) is employed within this Commonwealth; or(iii) is a student within this Commonwealth.§ 9799.83. Period of registration.(a) Requirement.--(1) Subject to subsection (d), a child abuse offender shall register with the Pennsylvania State Police for a period not less than 12 months nor more than 25 years, as determined by the court following a hearing under section 9799.81(f) (relating to child abuse risk assessment).(2) In determining the registration period to be imposed and whether the child abuse offender shall appear on the publicly accessible Internet website maintained by the Pennsylvania State Police in accordance with section 9799.93 (relating to publicly accessible Internet website), the court shall consider, at a minimum:(i) The factors under section 9799.81(b).(ii) The board's assessment submitted under section 9799.81(d).(iii) The child abuse offender's presentence investigation report.20250HB0849PN0879 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iv) Evidence or information presented by the child abuse offender.(b) Assessment by court after 15 years.--A child abuse offender may be exempt from the requirement to register, the requirement to verify residence, employment and enrollment in an educational institution, the requirement to appear on the publicly accessible Internet website maintained by the Pennsylvania State Police and all other requirements of this subchapter if subject to subsection (d), at least 15 years have elapsed prior to filing a petition with the sentencing court to be exempt from the requirements of this subchapter, during which time the petitioner has not been convicted in this Commonwealth or any other jurisdiction or foreign country of an offense punishable by imprisonment of more than one year, or the petitioner's release from custody following the petitioner's most recent conviction for an offense, whichever is later. The following apply:(1) After receipt of a petition filed under this subsection, the sentencing court shall enter an order directing that the petitioner be assessed by the board. After receipt from the court of an order for an assessment under this paragraph, a member of the board designated by the administrative officer of the board shall conduct an assessment of the petitioner to determine if the relief sought, if granted, is likely to pose a threat to the safety of any child. The board shall establish standards for evaluations and for evaluators conducting assessments.(2) The order for an assessment under this subsection shall be sent to the administrative officer of the board within 10 days of the entry. No later than 90 days following 20250HB0849PN0879 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 receipt of the order, the board shall submit a written report containing the board's assessment to the sentencing court, the district attorney and the attorney for the petitioner.(3) Within 120 days of filing the petition under this subsection, the sentencing court shall hold a hearing to determine whether to exempt the petitioner from the application of any or all of the requirements of this subchapter. The petitioner and the district attorney shall be given notice of the hearing and an opportunity to be heard, the right to call witnesses and the right to cross-examine witnesses. The petitioner shall have the right to counsel and to have a lawyer appointed to represent the petitioner if the petitioner cannot afford one.(4) The sentencing court shall exempt the petitioner from application of any or all of the requirements of this subchapter, at the discretion of the court, only upon a finding of clear and convincing evidence that exempting the child abuse offender from a particular requirement or all of the requirements of this subchapter is not likely to pose a threat to the safety of any child.(5) A court granting relief under this subsection shall notify the Pennsylvania State Police in writing within 10 days from the date the relief is granted. If a memorandum of understanding has been entered into under section 9799.92 (relating to victim notification) with respect to relief granted to the petitioner, the Pennsylvania State Police shall transmit the information about the relief to the Office of Victim Advocate as soon as is practicable. The Office of Victim Advocate shall notify the victim of the relief, in accordance with the memorandum of understanding, as described 20250HB0849PN0879 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 in section 9799.92.(6) The petitioner and the Commonwealth shall have the right to appellate review of the actions of the sentencing court under this subsection. An appeal by the Commonwealth shall stay the order of the sentencing court.(7) The petitioner may file an additional petition with the sentencing court no sooner than five years from the date of the final determination of a court regarding the petition.(8) If the petitioner is exempt from any provisions of this subchapter and the petitioner is subsequently convicted under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4915.3 (relating to failure to comply with child abuse offender registration requirements), relief granted under this subsection shall be void and the petitioner shall automatically and immediately again be subject to the provisions of this subchapter, as previously determined by this subchapter.(c) Commencement of registration.--(1) The period of registration ordered by the court in subsection (a) shall commence upon:(i) release from incarceration in a State or county correctional facility, including release to a community correction center or community contract facility;(ii) parole or a sentence of probation; or(iii) a sentence of State or county intermediate punishment in which the person is not sentenced to a period of incarceration.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), a child abuse offender shall initially register with the Pennsylvania State Police as required under section 9799.86 (relating to initial registration).20250HB0849PN0879 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Period of registration tolled.--(1) The period of registration under subsection (a) shall be tolled for the period of time in which the child abuse offender is:(i) incarcerated in a Federal, State or county correctional institution, excluding a community contract facility or community corrections center;(ii) subject to a sentence of intermediate punishment which is restrictive and where the individual is sentenced to a period of incarceration;(iii) committed to an institution or facility under section 6352(a)(3) (relating to disposition of delinquent child) that provides the individual with 24-hour-per-day supervision and care; or(iv) incarcerated in a Federal correctional institution, excluding a community contract facility or community corrections center.(2) This subsection shall apply to a child abuse offender who is recommitted to a Federal, State or county correctional institution for a parole violation or who has been sentenced to an additional term of imprisonment. In addition, this subsection shall apply to an individual committed to or recommitted to a Federal correctional institution. In the case of recommitment to a State or county correctional institution, the Department of Corrections or the county correctional facility shall notify the Pennsylvania State Police of the admission of the individual.(e) Periodic in-person appearance required.--A child abuse offender shall appear in person at an approved registration site to provide or verify the information under section 9799.84(b) 20250HB0849PN0879 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (relating to registry) and to be photographed annually.(f) In-person appearance to update information.--In addition to the periodic in-person appearance required in subsections (e) and (g), a child abuse offender shall appear in person at an approved registration site within three business days to provide current information relating to:(1) A change in name, including an alias.(2) A commencement of residence, change in residence, termination of residence or failure to maintain a residence, therefore making the individual a transient.(3) Commencement of employment, a change in the location or entity in which the individual is employed or a termination of employment.(4) Initial enrollment as a student, a change in enrollment as a student or termination as a student.(5) An addition or change in telephone number, including a cell phone number, or a termination of telephone number, including a cell phone number.(6) An addition, a change in and termination of a motor vehicle owned or operated, including watercraft or aircraft. In order to fulfill the requirements of this paragraph, the individual must provide any license plate numbers and registration numbers and other identifiers and an addition to or change in the address of the place the vehicle is stored.(7) A commencement of temporary lodging, a change in temporary lodging or a termination of temporary lodging. In order to fulfill the requirements of this paragraph, the individual must provide the specific length of time and the dates during which the individual will be temporarily lodged.(8) An addition, change in or termination of email 20250HB0849PN0879 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 address, instant message address or any other designations used in Internet communications or postings.(9) An addition, change in or termination of information related to occupational and professional licensing, including type of license held and license number.(g) Transients.--If the child abuse offender is a transient, the child abuse offender shall appear in person at an approved registration site to provide or to verify the information and to be photographed monthly. The duty to appear in person monthly and to be photographed shall apply until a transient establishes a residence. In the event a transient establishes a residence, the requirement of periodic in-person appearances under subsection (e) shall apply.(h) International travel.--In addition to the periodic in-person appearance required in subsection (e), a child abuse offender shall appear in person at an approved registration site no less than 21 days in advance of traveling outside of the United States and provide the following information:(1) Dates of travel, including date of return to the United States.(2) All destinations.(3) Temporary lodging.(i) In-person reporting by incarcerated or committed individuals.--The requirements of subsections (e), (f) and (g) shall not apply where the child abuse offender is:(1) incarcerated in a correctional institution, excluding a community contract facility or community corrections center;(2) subject to a sentence of intermediate punishment which is restrictive and where the individual is sentenced to 20250HB0849PN0879 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a period of incarceration;(3) committed to an institution or facility under section 6352(a)(3) which provides the individual with 24-hour-per-day supervision and care; or(4) committed to and receiving involuntary inpatient treatment in the State-owned facility or unit under Chapter 64 (relating to court-ordered involuntary treatment of certain sexually violent persons).§ 9799.84. Registry.(a) Establishment.--The Statewide registry of child abuse offenders is established in accordance with this subchapter. The Pennsylvania State Police shall create and maintain the registry. The registry shall be:(1) Composed of an electronic database and digitized records.(2) Able to communicate with child abuse offender registries established in other jurisdictions.(b) Information provided by child abuse offender.--A child abuse offender shall provide the following information to the Pennsylvania State Police which shall be included in the registry:(1) Primary or given name, including an alias used by the individual, nickname, pseudonym, ethnic or tribal name, regardless of the context used and any designations or monikers used for self-identification in Internet communications or postings.(2) Designation used by the individual for purposes of routing or self-identification in Internet communications or postings.(3) Telephone number, including cell phone number, and 20250HB0849PN0879 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 any other designation used by the individual for purposes of routing or self-identification in telephonic communications.(4) Valid Social Security number issued to the individual by the Federal Government and purported Social Security number.(5) Address of each residence or intended residence, whether or not the residence or intended residence is located within this Commonwealth and the location at which the individual receives mail, including a post office box. If the individual fails to maintain a residence and is therefore a transient, the individual shall provide information for the registry as required under paragraph (6).(6) If the individual is a transient, the individual shall provide information about the transient's temporary habitat or other temporary place of abode or dwelling, including a homeless shelter or park. In addition, the transient shall provide a list of places the transient eats, frequents and engages in leisure activities and any planned destinations, including those outside this Commonwealth. If the transient changes or adds to the places listed under this paragraph during a monthly period, the transient shall list these changes or additions when registering as a transient during the next monthly period. In addition, the transient shall provide the place the transient receives mail, including a post office box. The duty to provide the information under this paragraph shall apply until the transient establishes a residence. In the event a transient establishes a residence, the requirements of section 9799.83 (relating to period of registration) shall apply.(7) Temporary lodging. In order to fulfill the 20250HB0849PN0879 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requirements of this paragraph, the individual must provide the specific length of time and the dates during which the individual will be temporarily lodged.(8) A passport and documents establishing immigration status, which shall be copied in a digitized format for inclusion in the registry.(9) Name and address where the individual is employed or will be employed. In order to fulfill the requirements of this paragraph, if the individual is not employed in a fixed workplace, the individual shall provide information regarding general travel routes and general areas where the individual works.(10) Information relating to occupational and professional licensing, including type of license held and the license number.(11) Name and address where the individual is a student or will be a student.(12) Information relating to motor vehicles owned or operated by the individual, including watercraft and aircraft. In order to fulfill the requirements of this paragraph, the individual shall provide a description of each motor vehicle, watercraft or aircraft. The individual shall provide a license plate number, registration number or other identification number and the address of the place where a vehicle is stored. In addition, the individual shall provide the individual's license to operate a motor vehicle or other identification card issued by the Commonwealth, another jurisdiction or a foreign country so that the Pennsylvania State Police can fulfill its responsibilities under subsection (c)(7).20250HB0849PN0879 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (13) Actual date of birth and purported date of birth.(14) Form signed by the individual acknowledging the individual's obligations under this subchapter provided in accordance with section 9799.90 (relating to court notification and classification requirements).(c) Criminal justice information.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall ensure that the following information is included in or electronically accessible by the registry:(1) Physical description of the individual, including a general physical description and tattoos, scars and other identifying marks.(2) Text of the statute defining the criminal offense for which the individual is registered.(3) Criminal history record information of the individual, including:(i) Dates of arrests and convictions.(ii) Status of probation, parole or supervised release.(iii) Whether the individual is in compliance with this subchapter or has absconded.(iv) Existence of any outstanding warrants.(4) Current photograph of the individual. In order to fulfill the requirements of this paragraph, in addition to the requirement of photographs under this subchapter, the Pennsylvania State Police shall ensure that additional photographs are taken as needed when there is a significant change in appearance of the individual, including the taking of a current photograph before the individual is released from a State or county correctional institution or an institution or facility under section 6352(a)(3) (relating to 20250HB0849PN0879 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 disposition of delinquent child).(5) Set of fingerprints and palm prints of the individual. In order to fulfill the requirements of this paragraph, the palm prints shall be taken for the purpose of submission to the Federal Bureau of Investigation Central Database. The palm prints shall be submitted for entry into the database.(6) DNA sample of the individual. In order to fulfill the requirements of this paragraph, the sample shall be taken for the purpose of analysis and entry into the Combined DNA Index System. In addition, the sample shall be analyzed and submitted for entry into the Combined DNA Index System.(7) Photocopy of valid driver's license or identification card issued to the individual by the Commonwealth, another jurisdiction or a foreign country.(d) Cooperation.--There shall be cooperation between the Pennsylvania State Police, State and county correctional institutions, the Pennsylvania Parole Board, the county office of probation and parole, any court with jurisdiction over a child abuse offender, the chief juvenile probation officer of the court, juvenile probation and parole, the board and the Department of Human Services to ensure that the information under subsections (b) and (c) is provided and placed in the registry.§ 9799.85. Information sharing.(a) Duty of Pennsylvania State Police.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall, within three business days, make available information provided by an individual under sections 9799.83 (relating to period of registration), 9799.84 (relating to registry) and 9799.86 (relating to initial registration) to:20250HB0849PN0879 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) A jurisdiction in which the individual is required to register the individual's residence, employment or enrollment as a student.(2) A jurisdiction in which the individual has terminated the individual's residence, employment or enrollment as a student.(3) The district attorney of the county in which the individual:(i) establishes a residence, terminates a residence or is transient;(ii) commences employment or terminates employment; or(iii) enrolls as a student or terminates enrollment as a student.(4) The chief law enforcement officer of the police department of the municipality in which the individual:(i) establishes a residence, terminates a residence or is transient;(ii) commences employment or terminates employment; or(iii) enrolls as a student or terminates enrollment as a student.(5) The county office of probation and parole for the county in which the individual:(i) establishes a residence, terminates a residence or is transient;(ii) commences employment or terminates employment; or(iii) enrolls as a student or terminates enrollment as a student.20250HB0849PN0879 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) International residence.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall, within three business days, transfer information that a child abuse offender intends to establish residence in another country to:(1) A jurisdiction in which the child abuse offender is required to register residence, employment or enrollment as a student.(2) The United States Marshals Service.(3) The Department of Justice for inclusion in NCIC.(c) International travel.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall, within three business days, transfer information about international travel provided by the child abuse offender under section 9799.83(h) to:(1) A jurisdiction in which the child abuse offender is required to register the child abuse offender's residence, as a transient, employment or enrollment as a student.(2) The United States Marshals Service.(3) The Department of Justice for inclusion in NCIC.(d) National Child Protection Act agencies.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall, within three business days, transfer criminal history record information about a child abuse offender in the registry necessary to enable an agency responsible for conducting employment-related background checks under 34 U.S.C. § 40102 (relating to background checks).§ 9799.86. Initial registration.(a) Requirement.--A child abuse offender shall initially register with the Pennsylvania State Police as required under this section.(b) Supervision of individual convicted in Commonwealth who does not intend to reside in Commonwealth.--A child abuse 20250HB0849PN0879 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 offender who seeks transfer of supervision to another jurisdiction pursuant to the Interstate Compact for Adult Offender Supervision shall not have supervision transferred to another jurisdiction prior to the child abuse offender's registration with the Pennsylvania State Police as required under this section.(c) Registration if incarcerated within Commonwealth.--The following apply to incarcerated child abuse offenders:(1) If the child abuse offender is incarcerated in a Federal, State or county correctional facility, the child abuse offender shall provide the information specified in section 9799.84(b) (relating to registry) to the appropriate official of the Federal, State or county correctional facility or the Department of Corrections for inclusion in the registry before being released due to:(i) the expiration of sentence, in which case the information shall be collected no later than 10 days prior to the maximum expiration date;(ii) parole;(iii) State or county intermediate punishment where the sentence is restrictive and the individual is sentenced to a period of incarceration in a State or county correctional facility or a work release facility; or(iv) special probation supervised by the Department of Corrections.(2) For a child abuse offender described in paragraph (1), the appropriate official of the Federal, State or county correctional facility or the Department of Corrections shall collect and forward the information specified in section 20250HB0849PN0879 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 9799.84(b) to the Pennsylvania State Police. The appropriate official shall, in addition, ensure that the information specified in section 9799.84(c) is collected and forwarded to the Pennsylvania State Police. The information specified in section 9799.84(b) and (c) shall be included in the registry. With respect to child abuse offenders released under paragraph (1)(ii), (iii) or (iv), the State or county correctional facility shall not release the child abuse offender until the State or county correctional facility receives verification from the Pennsylvania State Police that the Pennsylvania State Police has received the information specified in section 9799.84(b) and (c). Verification may take place by electronic means. With respect to child abuse offenders released under paragraph (1)(i), if the child abuse offender refuses to provide the information specified in section 9799.84(b), the State or county correctional facility shall notify the Pennsylvania State Police or the municipal police department with jurisdiction over the facility of the failure to provide the information and of the expected date, time and location of the release of the child abuse offender.(d) Registration if sentenced to a State or county correctional facility.--If the child offender is sentenced to a period of incarceration in a State or county correctional facility, the child abuse offender shall provide the information specified in section 9799.84(b) as follows:(1) At the time of sentencing, the court shall require the child abuse offender to immediately report to the office of probation and parole serving that county to register under this subchapter. The appropriate office of probation and parole shall collect the information specified in section 20250HB0849PN0879 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 9799.84(b) from the individual and forward the information to the Pennsylvania State Police. The appropriate office of probation and parole shall, in addition, ensure the information specified in section 9799.84(c) is collected and forwarded to the Pennsylvania State Police. The information specified in section 9799.84(b) and (c) shall be included in the registry.(2) If the child abuse offender is incarcerated in a State or county correctional facility, the correctional facility shall notify the Pennsylvania State Police not more than 30 days in advance of, but not later than 10 days prior to, the child abuse offender's release from the correctional facility according to the following:(i) The correctional facility shall ensure that the information specified in section 9799.84(b) and (c) for the child abuse offender has been submitted to the Pennsylvania State Police.(ii) If the information has not been submitted to the Pennsylvania State Police, the correctional facility shall collect the information specified in section 9799.84(b) from the child abuse offender and forward the information to the Pennsylvania State Police.(iii) The correctional facility shall also report any changes to the information specified in section 9799.84(b) and (c) on file with the Pennsylvania State Police.(iv) In the case of parole, State intermediate punishment, State drug treatment programs or restrictive conditions of probation where the sentence is restrictive and the child abuse offender is sentenced to a period of 20250HB0849PN0879 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 incarceration in a State or county correctional facility or work release facility or special probation supervised by the Department of Corrections, the correctional facility may not release the child abuse offender until the correctional facility receives verification from the Pennsylvania State Police that the Pennsylvania State Police has received the information specified in section 9799.84(b) and (c). Verification by the Pennsylvania State Police may occur by electronic means.(v) If the child abuse offender is scheduled to be released from a State or county correctional facility due to the expiration of sentence and the child abuse offender refuses to provide the information specified in section 9799.84(b), the State or county correctional facility shall notify the Pennsylvania State Police or the municipal police department with jurisdiction over the facility of the failure to provide the information and of the expected date, time and location of the release of the child abuse offender.(e) Registration if sentenced to county intermediate punishment.--If the child abuse offender is sentenced to county intermediate punishment which is restorative where the child abuse offender is not sentenced to incarceration or to a work release facility, the child abuse offender shall provide the information specified in section 9799.84(b) by appearing at an approved registration site within 48 hours of being sentenced. The appropriate official of the county office of probation and parole shall ensure that the child abuse offender has appeared at an approved registration site as described in this subsection. If the individual fails to appear, the appropriate 20250HB0849PN0879 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 official of the county office of probation and parole shall notify the Pennsylvania State Police. The Pennsylvania State Police shall ensure the information specified in section 9799.84(c) with respect to the child abuse offender is collected and entered in the registry.(f) Registration if sentenced to county intermediate punishment.--If the child abuse offender is sentenced to county intermediate punishment, the following apply:(1) If the child abuse offender is sentenced to county intermediate punishment which is restorative, the child abuse offender shall provide the information specified in section 9799.84(b) by appearing at an approved registration site within 48 hours of being sentenced. The appropriate official of the county office of probation and parole shall ensure that the child abuse offender has appeared at an approved registration site as specified in this paragraph. If the child abuse offender fails to appear, the appropriate official of the county office of probation and parole shall notify the Pennsylvania State Police. The Pennsylvania State Police shall ensure the information specified in section 9799.84(c) with respect to the child abuse offender is collected and entered in the registry.(2) If the child abuse offender is sentenced to county intermediate punishment which is restrictive where the child abuse offender is not sentenced to incarceration or to a work release facility, the child abuse offender shall provide the information specified in section 9799.84(b) by appearing at an approved registration site within 48 hours of being sentenced. The appropriate official of the county office of probation and parole shall ensure that the child abuse 20250HB0849PN0879 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 offender has appeared at an approved registration site as described in this paragraph. If the child abuse offender fails to appear, the appropriate official of the county office of probation and parole shall notify the Pennsylvania State Police. The Pennsylvania State Police shall ensure the information specified in section 9799.84(c) with respect to the child abuse offender is collected and entered in the registry.(g) Registration if sentenced to county probation.--If the child abuse offender is sentenced to county probation, the child abuse offender shall provide the information specified in section 9799.84(b) by appearing at an approved registration site within 48 hours of being sentenced. The appropriate official of the county office of probation and parole shall ensure that the child abuse offender has appeared at an approved registration site as described in this subsection. If the child abuse offender fails to appear, the appropriate official of the county office of probation and parole shall notify the Pennsylvania State Police. The Pennsylvania State Police shall ensure the information specified in section 9799.84(c) with respect to the child abuse offender is collected and entered in the registry.(h) Registration for county probationers.--If the child abuse offender is serving a sentence of county probation, the appropriate office of probation and parole serving the county shall register the child abuse offender within 48 hours. The appropriate official of that office shall collect the information specified in section 9799.84(b) and forward that information to the Pennsylvania State Police. The Pennsylvania State Police shall ensure that the information specified in section 9799.84(c) is collected. The information specified in 20250HB0849PN0879 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section 9799.84(b) and (c) shall be included in the registry. If the child abuse offender fails to comply, the appropriate official of that office shall notify the Pennsylvania State Police.(i) Registration for State or county parolees.--(1) If the child abuse offender is serving a sentence of county parole, the appropriate office of probation and parole serving the county shall register the child abuse offender within 48 hours. The appropriate official of that office shall collect the information specified in section 9799.84(b) and forward that information to the Pennsylvania State Police. The Pennsylvania State Police shall ensure that the information specified in section 9799.84(c) is collected. The information specified in section 9799.84(b) and (c) shall be included in the registry. If the child abuse offender fails to comply, the appropriate official of that office shall notify the Pennsylvania State Police.(2) If the child abuse offender is serving a sentence of State parole, the Department of Corrections shall register the child abuse offender within 48 hours. The appropriate official of the Department of Corrections shall collect the information specified in section 9799.84(b) from the child abuse offender and forward the information to the Pennsylvania State Police. The Pennsylvania State Police shall ensure that the information specified in section 9799.84(c) is collected. The information specified in section 9799.84(b) and (c) shall be included in the registry. If the child abuse offender fails to comply, the appropriate official of the Department of Corrections shall notify the Pennsylvania State Police.20250HB0849PN0879 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 9799.87. Duty to inform.In order to implement section 9799.86 (relating to initial registration), as appropriate, the Pennsylvania State Police, the court having jurisdiction over the child abuse offender, the chief juvenile probation officer of the court and the appropriate official of the Department of Corrections, county office of probation and parole, the board, the Department of Human Services or a State or county correctional institution shall:(1) Inform the child abuse offender of the child abuse offender's duties under this subchapter.(2) Require the child abuse offender to read and sign a form stating that the duty to register has been explained and that the child abuse offender understands the registration requirement.(3) Collect the information required under section 9799.84 (b) and (c) (relating to registry) and forward the information to the Pennsylvania State Police for inclusion in the registry under this subchapter.§ 9799.88. Penalties.(a) Fails to register.--A child abuse offender shall be subject to prosecution under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4915.3 (relating to failure to comply with child abuse offender registration requirements) if the child abuse offender fails to:(1) register with the Pennsylvania State Police as required under section 9799.83 (relating to period of registration), 9799.86 (relating to initial registration) or 9799.91 (relating to verification by child abuse offenders and Pennsylvania State Police);(2) verify the information provided by the child abuse 20250HB0849PN0879 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 offender or be photographed as provided under section 9799.83 or 9799.91 or(3) provide accurate information when registering under sections 9799.83, 9799.86 and 9799.91.(b) Counseling.--A child abuse offender may be subject to prosecution under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4915.3 if the child abuse offender fails to comply with section 9799.101 (relating to counseling requirement).§ 9799.89. Enforcement.(a) Failure to comply.--If a child abuse offender fails to comply with section 9799.86 (relating to initial registration), 9799.88 (relating to penalties) or 9799.101 (relating to counseling requirement), the Pennsylvania State Police shall:(1) In cooperation with the district attorney, seek issuance of a warrant for the arrest of the child abuse offender and locate and arrest the child abuse offender for violating this section.(2) Notify the municipal police department where the child abuse offender has a residence, is a transient, is employed or is enrolled as a student. The municipal police shall, in cooperation with the district attorney, seek issuance of a warrant for the arrest of the child abuse offender and locate and arrest the child abuse offender for violating this section. In municipalities where no municipal police department exists, the Pennsylvania State Police shall proceed under paragraph (1).(b) If individual cannot be found.--(1) In the event the child abuse offender cannot be located:(i) The Pennsylvania State Police shall enter 20250HB0849PN0879 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 information in the registry indicating that the child abuse offender cannot be located.(ii) The Pennsylvania State Police shall provide information to NCIC to reflect that the child abuse offender cannot be located.(iii) The Pennsylvania State Police shall notify the United States Marshals Service.(2) If a warrant is issued pursuant to this subsection, the police department executing the warrant shall provide information to the NCIC Wanted Person File to reflect that a warrant has been issued for the child abuse offender's arrest.(c) Duty to inform Pennsylvania State Police.--In order to implement this subchapter, the court with jurisdiction over the child abuse offender, the chief juvenile probation officer of the court and the appropriate official of the Department of Corrections responsible for State parole supervision, the county office of probation and parole, the Department of Human Services or a State or county correctional institution shall inform the Pennsylvania State Police if the child abuse offender refuses to provide the information required by this subchapter so that the Pennsylvania State Police may comply with this section.§ 9799.90. Court notification and classification requirements.(a) Notice to child abuse offenders.--At the time of sentencing, the court shall inform the child abuse offender of the provisions of this subchapter. The court shall:(1) Specifically classify the individual as a child abuse offender.(2) Specifically inform the child abuse offender of:(i) the duty to register in accordance with sections 20250HB0849PN0879 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 9799.83 (relating to period of registration), 9799.84(b) (relating to registry), 9799.86 (relating to initial registration) and 9799.91 (relating to verification by child abuse offenders and Pennsylvania State Police); and(ii) the duty to attend counseling in accordance with section 9799.101 (relating to counseling requirement), if applicable.(3) In accordance with 9799.84, order that the fingerprints, palm prints, DNA sample and photograph of the child abuse offender be provided to the Pennsylvania State Police upon sentencing.(4) Require the child abuse offender to read and sign a form stating that the duty to register under this subchapter has been explained. If the child abuse offender is incapable of speaking, reading or writing the English language, the court shall certify the duty to register was explained to the child abuse offender, and the child abuse offender indicated an understanding of the duty.(b) Mandatory registration.--(1) All child abuse offenders must register in accordance with this subchapter.(2) Failure by the court to provide the information required in this section, to correctly inform a child abuse offender of the child abuse offender's obligations or to require a child abuse offender to register shall not relieve the child abuse offender from the requirements of this subchapter.(3) The court shall have no authority to relieve a child abuse offender from the duty to register under this subchapter or to modify the requirements of this subchapter 20250HB0849PN0879 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 relating to the child abuse offender.§ 9799.91. Verification by child abuse offenders and Pennsylvania State Police.(a) Periodic verification.--Except for initial registration as provided in section 9799.86 (relating to initial registration) and in accordance with section 9799.83(a) (relating to period of registration), a child abuse offender shall verify the information provided in section 9799.84(b) (relating to registry), by appearing in person at an approved registration site annually to be photographed.(b) Telephonic verification system.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall develop a mechanism to permit child abuse offenders to utilize a telephonic verification system. A child abuse offender may not utilize the telephonic verification system until the Pennsylvania State Police transmit a notice to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin that the telephonic verification system is operational.(c) Deadline.--(1) A child abuse offender shall appear as required under subsection (a) within 10 days before the date designated by the Pennsylvania State Police. Failure to appear within 10 days may subject the child abuse offender to prosecution under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4915.3 (relating to failure to comply with child abuse offender registration requirements).(2) In the case of a child abuse offender who fails to appear in person or by telephone as required under this section, the Pennsylvania State Police shall notify the municipal police department where the child abuse offender has a residence, is employed or is enrolled as a student. The 20250HB0849PN0879 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 municipal police shall locate the child abuse offender and arrest the offender for violating this section. A municipal police department may request assistance locating or arresting a child abuse offender from the Pennsylvania State Police. In municipalities where no municipal police department exists, the Pennsylvania State Police shall locate and arrest the child abuse offender for violating this section.(3) In the case of a child abuse offender who fails to appear in person or by telephone as required under this section, the Pennsylvania State Police shall notify the United States Marshals Service in accordance with section 9799.89(b)(1)(iii) (relating to enforcement).(d) Facilitation of verification.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall administer and facilitate the process of verification of information, including compliance with counseling and photographing the child abuse offender by:(1) Sending a notice by first class United States mail to each child abuse offender at the last reported location where the offender receives mail. The notice shall be sent not more than 30 days nor less than 15 days prior to the date a child abuse offender is required to appear under subsection (a). The notice shall remind the child abuse offender of the child abuse offender's responsibilities under this subchapter, including counseling, and provide a list of approved registration sites and the telephone number to contact the Pennsylvania State Police for verification under subsection (b).(2) Providing verification and compliance forms as necessary at each approved registration site.20250HB0849PN0879 - 38 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) Effect of notice.--Failure to send or receive notice of information under this section shall not relieve the child abuse offender from the requirements of this subchapter.(f) Natural disaster or evacuation event.--The occurrence of a natural disaster or other event requiring evacuation of residences shall not relieve the child abuse offender of the duty to register or any other duty imposed by this subchapter.(g) Group-based homes.--(1) A group-based home may not provide concurrent residence in the group-based home to more than five child abuse offenders at the same time.(2) A group-based home that violates paragraph (1) shall be subject to a civil penalty in the amount of $2,500 for a first violation and in the amount of $5,000 for a second or subsequent violation.(3) The Pennsylvania State Police or local law enforcement agency of a jurisdiction shall investigate compliance with this subsection, and the Attorney General or district attorney may commence a civil action in the court of common pleas of the county in which a group-based home is located to impose and collect from the group-based home the penalty under paragraph (2).(4) As used in this subsection, the term "group-based home" shall have the same meaning as under 61 Pa.C.S. § 5007(c) (relating to certain offenders residing in group-based homes).§ 9799.92. Victim notification.(a) Duty to inform victim.--(1) After an individual is determined to be a child abuse offender, a municipal police department or the 20250HB0849PN0879 - 39 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Pennsylvania State Police, if no municipal police jurisdiction exists, shall give written notice to the victim and the victim's parent or guardian when the child abuse offender registers initially under section 9799.86 (relating to initial registration) or under section 9799.83 (relating to period of registration). The notice shall be given within 72 hours after the child abuse offender registers or notifies the Pennsylvania State Police of current information under section 9799.83(f). The notice shall contain:(i) The child abuse offender's name.(ii) The residence of the child abuse offender. This subparagraph includes whether the child abuse offender is a transient, in which case the notice shall contain information about the transient's temporary habitat or other temporary place of abode or dwelling, including a homeless shelter or park. In addition, the notice shall contain a list of places the transient eats, frequents and engages in leisure activities.(iii) When applicable, the child abuse offender's address of:(A) Employment.(B) Institution where enrolled as a student.(2) A victim may terminate the duty to inform under this subsection by providing the local municipal police department or the Pennsylvania State Police, if no local municipal police department exists, with a written statement releasing that agency from the duty to comply with this section as it pertains to that victim.(b) Electronic notification option.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall develop and implement a system that allows a victim 20250HB0849PN0879 - 40 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and the victim's parent or guardian to receive electronic notifications when a child abuse offender provides current information to the Pennsylvania State Police.(c) Alternate means of notifying victims.--(1) The Pennsylvania State Police may enter into a memorandum of understanding with the Office of Victim Advocate to assist the Pennsylvania State Police in notifying victims and providing the information required under this section. If the Pennsylvania State Police enter into a memorandum, the memorandum of understanding must state the manner and method of notifying victims and the duties of the Pennsylvania State Police and the Office of Victim Advocate. A memorandum of understanding entered into under this subsection shall be valid for no more than 10 years. There shall be no limit to the number of memoranda of understanding which may be executed by the Pennsylvania State Police and the Office of Victim Advocate under this subsection.(2) As used in this subsection, the term "Office of Victim Advocate" shall mean the office established under section 301 of the act of November 24, 1998 (P.L.882, No.111), known as the Crime Victims Act.§ 9799.93. Publicly accessible Internet website.(a) Information to be made available.--The Pennsylvania State Police shall, in the manner and form directed by the Governor:(1) Develop and maintain a system for making information about child abuse offenders who are subject to public registration requirements under section 9799.83 (relating to period of registration) publicly available by electronic means via a publicly accessible Internet website. In order to 20250HB0849PN0879 - 41 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 fulfill the duties under this section, the Pennsylvania State Police shall ensure that the website:(i) Contains a feature to permit a member of the public to obtain relevant information for a child abuse offender by a query of the website based on search criteria, including searches for any given zip code or geographic radius set by the user.(ii) Contains a feature to allow a member of the public to receive electronic notification when a child abuse offender provides information under section 9799.83(f)(2), (3) or (4). This feature shall also allow a member of the public to receive electronic notification when the child abuse offender moves into or out of a geographic area chosen by the user.(iii) Is updated within three business days with the required information.(2) Include on the website:(i) Instructions on how to seek correction of information that an individual contends is erroneous.(ii) A warning that the information on the publicly accessible Internet website should not be used to unlawfully injure, harass or commit a crime against a child abuse offender and that any such action could result in criminal or civil penalties.(3) Include an explanation of the website's limitations, including statements advising that:(i) A positive identification of a child abuse offender may be confirmed only by fingerprints or DNA analysis.(ii) Some information contained on the website may 20250HB0849PN0879 - 42 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 be outdated or inaccurate.(iii) The website is not a comprehensive listing of every person who has ever committed a child-abuse-related offense in this Commonwealth.(4) Strive to ensure that the information contained on the website is accurate and that the data is revised and updated as required under paragraph (1)(iii).(5) Provide general information designed to inform and educate the public about child abuse offenders and the operation of this subchapter as well as pertinent and appropriate information concerning crime prevention and personal safety, with appropriate links to other relevant publicly accessible Internet websites operated by this Commonwealth.(b) Required information.--Notwithstanding 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 91 (relating to criminal history record information), the website developed under subsection (a) shall contain the following information regarding a child abuse offender:(1) Name and aliases.(2) Year of birth.(3) Street address, municipality, county, state and zip code of residences and intended residences. In the case of a child abuse offender who is a transient, the website shall contain information about the transient's temporary habitat or other temporary place of abode or dwelling, including a homeless shelter or park. In addition, the website shall contain a list of places the transient eats, frequents and engages in leisure activities.(4) Street address, municipality, county, state and zip code of any location at which a child abuse offender is 20250HB0849PN0879 - 43 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 enrolled as a student, if applicable.(5) Street address, municipality, county, state and zip code of a fixed location where a child abuse offender is employed. If a child abuse offender is not employed at a fixed address, the information shall include general areas of work.(6) Current facial photograph of a child abuse offender. The website shall, if available, show the last eight facial photographs taken of a child abuse offender and the date each photograph was entered into the registry.(7) Physical description of a child abuse offender.(8) License plate number and a description of a vehicle owned or operated by a child abuse offender.(9) Offenses that subject a child abuse offender to registration requirements under this subchapter.(10) A statement whether a child abuse offender is in compliance with registration requirements under this subchapter.(11) A statement regarding the age of the victim.(12) Date on which the child abuse offender is made active within the registry and date when the child abuse offender most recently updated registration information.(13) Indication as to whether the child abuse offender is a sexually violent predator, sexually violent delinquent child or convicted of a Tier I, Tier II or Tier III sexual offense under Ch. 97 Subch. H (relating to registration of sexual offenders).(14) If applicable, indication that a child abuse offender is incarcerated, committed or a transient.(c) Prohibited information.--The publicly accessible 20250HB0849PN0879 - 44 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Internet website shall not contain:(1) The identity of any victim.(2) The Social Security number of a child abuse offender.(3) Any information relating to arrests of a child abuse offender that did not result in conviction.(4) Travel and immigration document numbers.(d) Duration of posting.--The information listed in subsection (b) shall be made available on the publicly accessible Internet website unless a child abuse offender is deceased or is no longer required to register under this subchapter.§ 9799.94. Administration.The Governor shall direct the Pennsylvania State Police, the board, the Department of Corrections, the Department of Transportation and any other agency of the Commonwealth that the Governor deems necessary to collaboratively design, develop and implement an integrated and secure system of communication, storage and retrieval of information to assure the timely, accurate and efficient administration of this subchapter.§ 9799.95. Global positioning system technology.The Pennsylvania Parole Board, the Department of Corrections, the agents of the Department of Corrections and county probation authorities may impose supervision conditions that include tracking through global positioning system technology.§ 9799.96. Immunity for good faith conduct.The following entities, entities' agents and employees shall be immune from liability for good faith conduct under this subchapter:(1) The Pennsylvania State Police and local law 20250HB0849PN0879 - 45 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 enforcement agencies.(2) District attorneys.(3) Superintendents, administrators, teachers, employees and volunteers engaged in the supervision of children of any public, private or parochial school.(4) Directors and employees of county children and youth agencies.(5) Presidents or similar officers of universities and colleges, including community colleges.(6) The Pennsylvania Parole Board.(7) County probation and parole offices.(8) Licensees of certified day-care centers and directors of licensed preschool programs and owners and operators of registered family day-care homes.(9) The Department of Corrections.(10) County correctional facilities.(11) Board members.(12) Juvenile probation offices.(13) The Department of Human Services.§ 9799.97. Duties of Pennsylvania State Police.The Pennsylvania State Police shall have the following duties:(1) To create and maintain the Statewide registry of child abuse offenders in conformity with this subchapter.(2) In consultation with the Department of Corrections, the Office of Attorney General, the Administrative Office of Pennsylvania Courts and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Judiciary Committee of the House of Representatives, to promulgate 20250HB0849PN0879 - 46 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 regulations necessary for the general administration of this subchapter. Regulations shall establish procedures to allow a child abuse offender, including a transient, to fulfill the requirements at approved registration sites throughout this Commonwealth. The Pennsylvania State Police shall transmit a list of approved registration sites to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin and provide a list of approved registration sites in any notice sent to child abuse offenders. An approved registration site shall be capable of submitting fingerprints, palm prints, DNA samples and any other information required electronically to the Pennsylvania State Police. The Pennsylvania State Police shall require that approved registration sites submit fingerprints utilizing the Integrated Automated Fingerprint Identification System or in another manner and in a form the Pennsylvania State Police require. Approved registration sites may not be limited to sites managed by the Pennsylvania State Police and shall include sites managed by local law enforcement agencies that meet the criteria for approved registration sites under this paragraph.(3) Transfer information under section 9799.85 (relating to information sharing).(4) To enforce this subchapter in accordance with section 9799.89 (relating to enforcement).(5) To facilitate verification of information from child abuse offenders as provided in section 9799.91 (relating to verification by child abuse offenders and Pennsylvania State Police).(6) In consultation with the Department of Corrections, 20250HB0849PN0879 - 47 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to promulgate regulations directing State and county correctional facilities and State and county probation and parole offices regarding the completion of information, including the taking of photographs, required under this subchapter.(7) To develop the telephonic verification system established under section 9799.91(b).§ 9799.98. Duties of Department of Corrections and probation and parole officials.(a) Duties.--The Department of Corrections and the county office of probation and parole shall:(1) Perform duties on behalf of the Department of Corrections and the county office of probation and parole in accordance with section 9799.86 (relating to initial registration).(2) On a form prescribed by the Pennsylvania State Police, notify the Pennsylvania State Police each time a child abuse offender is arrested, recommitted to a State or county correctional institution for a parole violation or incarcerated.(b) Notification form.--The Department of Corrections shall create a notification form which provides county prison and probation and parole personnel with information on the process of informing child abuse offenders of mandates under this subchapter.§ 9799.99. Duties of facilities housing child abuse offenders.The Department of Corrections, a county correctional facility and the separate or State-owned facility shall have the following duties:(1) To perform duties in accordance with section 9799.86 20250HB0849PN0879 - 48 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (relating to initial registration). This paragraph includes taking a current photograph of the child abuse offender before the offender is released from confinement or commitment or is discharged.(2) On a form prescribed by the Pennsylvania State Police, to notify the Pennsylvania State Police each time a child abuse offender is incarcerated, committed or released, including supervised release. This paragraph shall include a community corrections center or community contract facility.(3) To assist child abuse offenders registering under this subchapter.§ 9799.100. Board.(a) Composition.--The board shall be composed of psychiatrists, psychologists and criminal justice experts, each of whom is an expert in the field of the behavior and treatment of child abuse offenders.(b) Appointment.--The Parole Board shall appoint members of the board.(c) Term of office.--Members of the board shall serve four-year terms.(d) Compensation.--The members of the board shall be compensated at a rate of $350 per assessment and receive reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses while performing the business of the board. The chairman shall receive $500 additional compensation annually.(e) Staff.--The board shall employ an executive director and other staff as necessary to carry out the board's duties under this subchapter. The executive director shall direct the operations, management and administration of the board and organize and oversee the work of the staff. Legal counsel for 20250HB0849PN0879 - 49 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the board shall be provided in accordance with the act of October 15, 1980 (P.L.950, No.164), known as the Commonwealth Attorneys Act. Upon request by the board, the Department of Corrections shall make available facilities, administrative support and other assistance to the board.§ 9799.101. Counseling requirement.(a) Monthly counseling.--A child abuse offender who is not incarcerated shall be required to attend at least monthly counseling sessions in a program approved by the board and be financially responsible for all fees assessed from the counseling sessions. The board shall monitor the compliance of the child abuse offender. If the child abuse offender can prove to the satisfaction of the court that the child abuse offender cannot afford to pay for the counseling sessions, the child abuse offender shall nonetheless attend the counseling sessions and the parole office shall pay the requisite fees.(b) Penalty.--A child abuse offender who knowingly fails to attend counseling sessions as provided in this section shall be subject to prosecution under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4915.3 (relating to failure to comply with child abuse offender registration requirements).(c) Notification.--A provider of counseling services under subsection (a) shall notify the district attorney of the county and the chief law enforcement officer, as defined in section 8951 (relating to definitions), of the municipality in the county and municipality where the provider is located that the provider is counseling child abuse offenders. Notifications under this subsection shall be submitted in writing by January 15 of each year and shall include the address of the provider.§ 9799.102. Photographs and fingerprinting.20250HB0849PN0879 - 50 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 A child abuse offender shall submit to fingerprinting and photographing as required by this subchapter. Fingerprinting as required by this subchapter shall, at a minimum, require submission of a full set of fingerprints and palm prints. Photographing as required by this subchapter shall, at a minimum, require submission to photographs of the face and any scars, marks, tattoos or other unique features of the individual. Fingerprints and photographs obtained under this subchapter may be maintained for use under this subchapter and for general law enforcement purposes.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0849PN0879 - 51 - 1234567891011